Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB144.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 217.280 TO 217.390 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A food service establishment required under 21 C.F.R. sec. 101.11 to provide calorie
information for standard menu items shall display in a prominent place easily seen by
customers a printed sign at least eight and one-half (8-1/2) by eleven (11) inches in size
stating that the food service establishment's menu is also available without calorie
information:
(1) Upon the request of a customer; or
(2) On the website of the food service establishment.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/6/2026 12:54 PM Jacketed